Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Chapter 33

Powers and Offices Under Modified Manager-Council Charter

6-33-101. Powers.

Every territory incorporating under chapters 30-36 of this title has all the powers and authority enumerated in §§ 6-2-201, 6-19-101 and 6-19-102.

In addition to the powers granted in subsection (a), any city incorporated under chapters 30-36 of this title has the power to:

Purchase, acquire, construct, own, operate, maintain, extend, improve, repair, equip and dispose of community antenna television systems or microwave multi-point distribution systems, or both, for the benefit of the citizens of the city. The city may operate any such system as a department or part of a department of the city or place its operation in a separate board or in an existing electric or utility board, as provided by ordinance; and

Borrow money to purchase, acquire, construct, extend, improve, repair or equip any such system and issue its bonds or notes therefor, including refunding bonds, in such form and upon such terms as it may determine. Any such bonds or notes shall be issued pursuant to the procedures set forth in and shall be governed by title 9, chapter 21, including provisions dealing with covenants permitted in bond resolutions, security and remedies of bondholders, and the system described in this subdivision (b)(2) shall be deemed to be a “public works project,” as defined in title 9, chapter 21.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 2.01; T.C.A., § 6-3301; Acts 1989, ch. 193, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 6-2-201, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1; a new § 6-2-201 was enacted by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.

Cross-References. Annexation, title 6, ch. 51, part 1.

Building inspectors, joint hiring authorized, § 6-54-116.

Solid waste energy recovery facilities, construction authorized, title 68, ch. 211, part 5.

Transportation systems, ownership of, title 7, ch. 56.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

Attorney General Opinions. Municipalities have the authority to enact child curfew laws, OAG 00-158, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 161 (10/17/00).

Unless and until the legislature enacts legislation implementing a state lottery, which would include authorization for the sale of lottery tickets statewide, a local government may enact an ordinance prohibiting the sale of lottery tickets within its jurisdiction, OAG 03-004, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 4 (1/17/03).

Cities and counties lack statutory authority to regulate mortgage transactions, OAG 03-016, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (2/11/03).

Adoption of ordinance requiring persons who lease residential real property within a municipality to obtain an annual license and pay a charge for each unit leased, OAG 06-103, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 112 (6/21/06).

Local governments may regulate itinerant vendors and temporary sales activity that takes place along a state highway, OAG 08-188, 2008 Tenn. AG LEXIS 233 (12/16/08).

Regulation of distribution of ephedrine and pseudoephedrine by local governments. OAG 13-99, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 102 (12/6/13).

6-33-102. City judge — Employees of city court — Compensation — Vacancies — Special judge.

The city judge shall be a person licensed to practice law in the state of Tennessee and shall be elected by popular vote at the same time as provided for election of the governing body of such corporation, and in the same manner as provided for election to the board of education.

Such judge shall be elected for a term of four (4) years.

The city council shall by ordinance provide for the compensation of the city judge and other employees of the court, except that the judge shall be authorized to appoint, promote, suspend, remove or to take any other established personnel action with respect to the court clerk and other court employees consistent with this charter. The compensation fixed for the judge and court employees shall in no way be related to the amount of moneys collected by the court, and the compensation so fixed shall be in lieu of all fees, fines, penalties, forfeitures, or other moneys collected by the court.

A vacancy shall exist if the city judge resigns, dies, or has been continuously disabled for a period of three (3) months so as to prevent the city judge from discharging the duties of office; and such vacancy shall be filled by a majority vote of the city council, the appointee to serve until the next regular city or county election, whichever is first held, at which election a duly qualified person shall be elected to fill the unexpired term of the office.

Whenever the city judge finds it necessary to be absent from holding court, the city judge may designate in writing, to be filed with the clerk of the city court, a name of a special judge to hold court in the city judge's place and stead. The special judge shall be a person who has the qualifications of city judge and the special judge shall take the same oath and have the same authority as the regular city judge to hold court for the occasion.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 6.01; 1959, ch. 318, § 1; 1965, ch. 331, § 1; 1973, ch. 57, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-3302.

Cross-References. Judges, municipal, minimum salary in municipalities of over 170,000 population, § 6-56-151.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Municipal Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 431 (1978).

6-33-103. Operations and jurisdiction of city courts.

A city court is created to be administered and presided over by a city judge. The judge of the city court shall have jurisdiction in and over all cases for the violation of and all cases arising under the laws and ordinances of the city. The city judge, in all cases heard or determined by such city judge for offenses against the corporate laws and ordinances, shall set and collect municipal court costs in accordance with § 16-18-304, and shall levy and collect the litigation tax in accordance with § 16-18-305. In all cases where the offender is committed to the jail or workhouse for failure to pay fines, costs or forfeitures, the offender shall be credited with two dollars ($2.00) for each day's imprisonment. The city judge shall be vested with the jurisdiction formerly exercised by justices of the peace in all cases of violation of the criminal laws of the state within the limits of the city. Warrants, subpoenas, orders and other processes of the court shall be executed by the police officers of the city who for such purposes shall have the same powers and authority of a sheriff in executing process of a circuit court. The council may authorize any officer or employee of the court to accept pleas of guilty and to fix fines in cases of minor traffic violations, as defined by the city council, and to issue warrants and accept bail bonds. All fines, penalties, forfeitures, and money collected by the court, or the officers and employees thereof, shall be promptly turned over to the city treasury. The council shall require an audit of the accounts of the court at least annually. The records of the court shall be prescribed by ordinance.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 6.02; 1978, ch. 909, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; modified; T.C.A., § 6-3303; Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 6c; 2009, ch. 146, § 1.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Municipal Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 431 (1978).

Attorney General Opinions. City courts have jurisdiction to enforce a child curfew law against a parent, OAG 00-158, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 161 (10/17/00).

6-33-104. Removal of city judge.

The city judge shall be subject to removal from office for the same causes and in the same manner as provided for the removal of public officers by title 8, chapter 47. In case of the absence or inability of the judge to serve, the city council may appoint and fix the compensation of an acting city judge who may be removed at any time without cause. Except as provided in this chapter, officers and employees of the court are also subject to § 6-35-403.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 6.03; 1959, ch. 318, § 2; T.C.A., § 6-3304.

6-33-105. Advisory boards.

The council shall by ordinance create a personnel advisory board and may create such other boards advisory to the council and manager with respect to specific municipal functions as it may deem necessary, prescribing in each case the number, manner of appointment, length of term, and advisory duties of members of such boards who shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in official duties.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 6.13; T.C.A., § 6-3305.

6-33-106. Planning commission.

The council shall establish a planning commission, and may by ordinance within the framework of this charter, exercise authority in the fields of planning, zoning, subdivision control and related activities as provided by general laws of the state. The rules and regulations of the planning commission shall have no force or effect unless approved by the council. No later than ninety (90) days prior to each fiscal year, the planning commission shall submit to the city manager a long-term capital improvement program with recommendations as to the priority of individual projects and the methods of financing them. The members of the planning commission shall serve without compensation, but may be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in official duties.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 6.14; T.C.A., § 6-3306.

6-33-107. Intergovernmental and interlocal agreements and contracts.

In addition to other powers granted in this charter, the city council has the power to contract and cooperate with any other municipality or other political subdivision of the state, or with an elective or appointive official thereof, or with any duly authorized agency of the federal or state government for:

The planning, development, construction, acquisition, or operation of any public improvement, utility, or facility;

A common public service;

Having the same individuals serve as officers or employees in more than one (1) political subdivision or federal or state agency, or any of these subdivisions or agencies, on a part-time basis in each;

The construction or operation of federally-owned utilities and other property on behalf of the federal government;

The acquisition by gift or by transfer or by purchase of federal property and if by purchase for the financing of its acquisition;

Entering into contracts relating to acceptance of payments in lieu of taxes or state, federal, or other contributions; and

The furnishing of services to the federal government and its designees, outside the city limits as well as within.

The subject and purpose of any such contract or cooperative action made and entered into by the council shall be within the scope of the powers of the city.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 6.15; T.C.A., § 6-3307.

Collateral References.

Power of municipalities or other political subdivision to engage in a joint project or enterprise. 123 A.L.R. 997.

6-33-108. Powers under cooperative agreements.

The city council may exercise the powers conferred in § 6-33-107 by ordinance setting out the terms agreed upon by the parties to such a contract or cooperative action. The parties to such a contract or cooperative action, or any of them, may acquire, by gift or purchase, or by the power of eminent domain exercised by one (1) or more of the parties, the lands, buildings, and other property necessary or useful for the purposes of the contract or cooperative action, either within or without the corporate limits of one (1) or more of the contracting parties, and shall have the power to hold or acquire such lands as tenants in common. The city may provide for the financing of its share or portion of the cost or expenses of such a contract or cooperative action in the same manner and by the same procedure for the financing by the city of the subject and purposes of the contract or cooperative action as if acting alone and on its own behalf.

Such contract also may provide for the establishment and selection of a joint commission, officer, or officers to supervise, manage, and have charge of such joint service or project, and may provide for the powers and duties, terms of office, compensation, if any, and other provisions relating to the members of such joint commission, officer, or officers. Such contract may include and specify terms and provisions relative to the termination or cancellation of the contract or cooperative action by ordinance or resolution, and the notice, if any, to be given of such termination or cancellation; provided, that such termination or cancellation shall not relieve any party participating in such contract or cooperative action from any obligation or liability for its share of the cost or expense incurred prior to the effective date of any such termination or cancellation.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 6.16; T.C.A., § 6-3308.

Collateral References.

Power of municipalities or other political subdivisions to engage in a joint project or enterprise. 123 A.L.R. 997.

6-33-109. Liability of officers under cooperative agreements.

All public officers acting under the authority of a contract or cooperative action under § 6-33-107 or § 6-33-108 are deemed to be subject to the same liabilities to which they would have been subjected for actions occurring entirely within their own territorial limits.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 6.17; T.C.A., § 6-3309.

6-33-110. Deposits and disbursements of funds under cooperative agreements.

All money received pursuant to any such contract or cooperative action, under § 6-33-107 or § 6-33-108, unless otherwise provided by law, shall be deposited in the appropriate fund or funds and disbursed in accordance with such contract or cooperative action.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 6.18; T.C.A., § 6-3310.

6-33-111. Franchises.

No franchise or grant for the operation of a water, electric, telephone, steam, or public transportation or other utility that is not revocable at the will of the council shall be granted or become operative, except by ordinance. Such ordinance shall become effective thirty (30) days after its adoption by the council unless twenty percent (20%) of the qualified electors of the city sign a petition and present it to the council during such thirty-day period requesting that the ordinance be referred to the electors, in which case it must receive the approval of a majority of the electors voting thereon at a municipal election, and all renewals, extensions and amendments thereof shall be granted only in the same manner.

All public utility franchises granted under this charter shall be subject to the following rights of the city; provided, that this enumeration is not to be construed as being exclusive or as impairing council authority to impose any condition that may be in the municipal interest and within the power of the city to impose or require:

To revoke for misuse, or nonuse, or for failure to comply with the provisions thereof;

To require proper and adequate provision, extension, and maintenance of plant and service at the highest practicable standard of performance;

To establish reasonable standards of service and prevent unjust discrimination in service or rates;

To require uninterrupted service to the public in accordance with the terms of the franchise throughout the entire period thereof; and

To impose such other regulations as may be determined by the council to be necessary to the health, safety, welfare, and accommodation of the public.

The council may institute such actions or proceedings as may be necessary to enforce a franchise and may revoke, cancel, or annul all franchises that have become inoperative, illegal, or void and not binding upon the city. Subject to state law, all public utility franchises shall prescribe the manner of fixing rates, fares, and charges, and the readjustments thereof at reasonable intervals at the discretion of the city. The value of the property of the utility used as a basis for fixing such rates, fares, and charges shall in no event include a value predicated upon the franchise, good will, or prospective profits.

This section shall not be construed to repeal, abridge, modify or supersede any statute or law of the state pertaining to the Tennessee public utility commission or the regulation of public utilities which are subject to its jurisdiction, and subdivisions (b)(2), (3), and (4) shall not apply to any public utility over which the commission exercises regulatory authority.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 6.35; T.C.A., § 6-3311; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 72; 2017, ch. 94, §§ 7, 78.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (d), substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority”, and substituted “the commission exercises” for “the authority exercises”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Collateral References.

Municipality's liability in damages for refusal to grant franchise. 37 A.L.R.2d 694.

Inclusion of different franchise rights or purposes in same ordinance. 127 A.L.R. 1049.

6-33-112. Official city newspaper.

The council by resolution shall designate a newspaper of general circulation in the city as the official city newspaper.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 9.03; T.C.A., § 6-3312.

6-33-113. City attorney.

The council shall appoint a city attorney, together with such assistant city attorneys as the council shall determine are required.

The city attorney shall:

Be responsible for representing and defending the city in all litigation in which the city is a party;

Be the prosecuting officer in the city court;

Attend all meetings of the council;

Advise the council, city manager and other officers and employees of the city concerning legal aspects of the city's affairs;

Approve as to form and legality all contracts, deeds, bonds, ordinances, resolutions, motions, and other official documents; and

Perform such other duties as may be prescribed by the council or city manager.

Acts 1961, ch. 255, § 2; T.C.A., § 6-3313.